test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-program_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - program: # Noun 126 'eng /est programm/fin' - full paradigm
     program+N+Sg+Nom: program
     program+N+Sg+Gen: program
     program+N+Sg+Par: programmõ
     program+N+Sg+Dat: programmõn
     program+N+Sg+Ins: programmõks
     program+N+Sg+Ill: programmõ
     program+N+Sg+Ela: programst
     program+N+Pl+Nom: programmõd
     program+N+Pl+Gen: programmõd
     program+N+Pl+Par: programmidi
     program+N+Pl+Dat: programmõdõn
     program+N+Pl+Ins: programmõdõks
     program+N+Pl+Ill: programmiž
     program+N+Pl+Ela: programmist
